Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3342.06
Restriction on advertising and promotional materials.

Any advertising or promotional materials relating to the State Disbursement Unit may include references to a public office but shall not refer to an officeholder by name.

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 6.